Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.575

Information in automatic number identification or automatic location identification database that is part of county 911 emergency communications system—Other information associated with county 911 emergency communications system—Exemption from public inspection and copying.

(1) Information contained in an automatic number identification or automatic location identification database that is part of a county 911 emergency communications system as defined in RCW 82.14B.020 and intended for display at a public safety answering point with incoming 911 voice or data is exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) Information voluntarily submitted to be contained in a database that is part of or associated with a county 911 emergency communications system as defined in RCW 82.14B.020 and intended for the purpose of display at a public safety answering point with incoming 911 voice or data is exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(3) This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit:

(a) Display of information at a public safety answering point;

(b) Dissemination of information by the public safety answering point to police, fire, or emergency medical responders for display on a device used by police, fire, or emergency medical responders for the purpose of handling or responding to emergency calls or for training;

(c) Maintenance of the database by a county;

(d) Dissemination of information by a county to local agency personnel for inclusion in an emergency notification system that makes outgoing calls to telephone numbers to provide notification of a community emergency event;

(e) Inspection or copying by the subject of the information or an authorized representative; or

(f) The public disclosure of information prepared, retained, disseminated, transmitted, or recorded, for the purpose of handling or responding to emergency calls, unless disclosure of any such information is otherwise exempted under chapter 42.56 RCW or other law.

[ 2022 c 203 s 18; 2015 c 224 s 6.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.